Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.100

Background checks—Disqualifying crimes and acts.

Any employee, owner, or operator of an agency that works with vulnerable adults must pass a criminal background check every twenty-four months and not have been convicted of any crime that is disqualifying under RCW 43.43.830 or 43.43.842, or been found by a court of law or disciplinary authority to have abused, neglected, financially exploited, or abandoned a minor or vulnerable adult.

[ 2011 c 357 s 11.]